Utah, session 2026, SB11.
Section 1. Section 63I-1-213 is amended to read:63I-1-213. Repeal dates: Title 13.(1)Title 13, Chapter 1b, Office of Professional Licensure Review, is repealed July 1, 2034.(2)Section 13-43-202, Land Use and Eminent Domain Advisory Board -- Appointment -- Compensation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(3)Title 13, Chapter 79, Office of the Homeowners' Association Ombudsman, is repealed July 1, 2030.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.